Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
UNIFORM UNCLAIMED PROPERTY ACT [OLD]

§§523A-1 to 523A-41 REPEALED. L 2008,
c 55, §4.

[PART I.]
UNIFORM UNCLAIMED PROPERTY ACT

Revision Note

Enacted as a new chapter, this part was redesignated as Part I
of this chapter pursuant to §23G-15. References to "chapter"
throughout this part changed to "part".

[§523A-1] Short title. This part may
be cited as the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act. [L 2008, c 55, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next